Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Affected person" means an apiarist, manufacturer, processor, first handler, broker, or volunteer who shall pay to the commission the minimum assessments required in RCW 15.62.140.

(2) "Apiarist" means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation who owns, operates, manages, or brokers ten or more honey bee (Apis mellifera) colonies or any volunteer participant having less than ten colonies in the state of Washington.

(3) "Bee colony" means a natural group of honey bees containing seven thousand or more workers and one or more queens, housed in a man-made hive with movable frames, and operated as a beekeeping unit.

(4) "Broker" means any person other than an apiarist who, for a fee, places or sets twenty-five or more bee colonies for pollination or buys and sells one thousand dollars or more per year of industry products he or she does not produce or manufacture.

(5) "Commission" means the Washington state honey bee industry commission or its authorized agents.

(6) "Department" means the department of agriculture.

(7) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture.

(8) "First handler" means any person in Washington who imports industry products or bee supplies and equipment into Washington for processing, packing, or sale in the state of Washington.

(9) "Industry products" means queen bees, packaged bees, and items which are made by bees including, but not limited to, honey, pollen, bees wax, and propolis and items manufactured for use in the honey bee industry as enumerated under "manufacturer" in this section.

(10) "Manufacturer" means any person making bee supplies and equipment such as: Supers (hive boxes), frames, bees wax foundation, smokers, extractors, bee veils, pollen traps, queen rearing equipment, bee cages and packages, queen excluders, and other bee supplies used in the honey bee industry.

(11) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, or corporation engaged in the apiculture industry.

(12) "Processor" means any person processing, selling, marketing, or distributing bee industry products.

(13) "Retail sales" means those sales made directly to consumers whether apiarists, brokers, or persons involved in the apiculture industry, or the public.

[ 1989 c 5 s 2.]